Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2878.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-440, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-440. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Bulk records": (a) Means multiple records that are retrieved collectively from the department's database as a result of a single request. Bulk records (b) Does not include retrieving one record at a time from a single request. 2. "Consular identification card" means a form of identification that meets the requirements prescribed in section 41-5001. 2. 3. "Duplicate" means a counterpart produced by any of the following: (a) The same impression or from the same matrix as the original. (b) Means of photography, including enlargements and miniatures. (c) Mechanical or electronic rerecording. (d) Chemical reproduction. (e) Any other equivalent technique that accurately reproduces the original. 3. 4. "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol or process attached to or logically associated with a document and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document. 4. 5. "Express consent" means consent in writing, including consent that is conveyed electronically and that bears an electronic signature. 5. 6. "Highly restricted personal information" means an individual's photograph or image, social security number, individual taxpayer identification number, consular identification card number and medical or disability information. 6. 7. "Insurance support organization" has the same meaning prescribed in section 20-2102. 7. 8. "Medical or disability information" means a restriction or medical code placed on a person's motor vehicle record pursuant to section 28-3159, subsection A, paragraph 1 or section 28-3167. 8. 9. "Motor vehicle record" means any record that pertains to a driver license or permit, vehicle registration, vehicle title or identification document issued by the department or its duly authorized third parties, agents or contractors that are authorized to issue any of those documents. 9. 10. "Opt in" means a customer of the department has provided express consent to the department to allow the release of the customer's personal information, including highly restricted personal information, in a form prescribed by the director. 10. 11. "Original": (a) Of a record means the record itself or any counterpart intended to have the same effect by the person executing or issuing it. (b) Of a photograph means the negative or a print from the negative. (c) Of data stored in a computer or similar device means a printout or other output that is readable by sight and that is shown to reflect the data accurately. 11. 12. "Personal information" means information that identifies an individual and that includes an individual's photograph, social security number, driver identification number, name, address, telephone number and medical or disability information. Personal information does not include an individual's five-digit zip code and information about vehicular accidents, driving violations and driver status. 12. 13. "Photographs" includes still photographs, x-ray films, videotapes, motion pictures and digitized electronic images. 13. 14. "Records" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-151. 14. 15. "Vehicle history report" means a report that is developed to track the registration and total loss history of a particular vehicle and includes odometer readings and brand codes, title brand codes and any related vehicle data.  Vehicle history report does not include names and addresses. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 28-3153, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3153. Driver license issuance; prohibitions A. The department shall not issue the following: 1. A driver license to a person who is under eighteen years of age, except that the department may issue: (a) A restricted instruction permit for a class D or G license to a person who is at least fifteen years of age. (b) An instruction permit for a class D, G or M license as provided by this chapter to a person who is at least fifteen years and six months of age. (c) A class G or M license as provided by this chapter to a person who is at least sixteen years of age. 2. A class D, G or M license or instruction permit to a person who is under eighteen years of age and who has been tried in adult court and convicted of a second or subsequent violation of criminal damage to property pursuant to section 13-1602, subsection A, paragraph 1 or convicted of a felony offense in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used, including theft of a motor vehicle pursuant to section 13-1802, unlawful use of means of transportation pursuant to section 13-1803 or theft of means of transportation pursuant to section 13-1814, or who has been adjudicated delinquent for a second or subsequent act that would constitute criminal damage to property pursuant to section 13-1602, subsection A, paragraph 1 or adjudicated delinquent for an act that would constitute a felony offense in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used, including theft of a motor vehicle pursuant to section 13-1802, unlawful use of means of transportation pursuant to section 13-1803 or theft of means of transportation pursuant to section 13-1814, if committed by an adult. 3. A class A, B or C license to a person who is under twenty-one years of age, except that the department may issue a class A, B or C license that is restricted to only intrastate driving to a person who is at least eighteen years of age. 4. A license to a person whose license or driving privilege has been suspended, during the suspension period. 5. Except as provided in section 28-3315, a license to a person whose license or driving privilege has been revoked. 6. A class A, B or C license to a person who has been disqualified from obtaining a commercial driver license. 7. A license to a person who on application notifies the department that the person is an alcoholic as defined in section 36-2021 or a drug dependent person as defined in section 36-2501, unless the person submits a medical examination report that includes a current evaluation from an addiction counselor indicating that, in the opinion of the counselor, the condition does not affect or impair the person's ability to safely operate a motor vehicle. 8. A license to a person who has been adjudged to be incapacitated pursuant to section 14-5304 and who at the time of application has not obtained either a court order that allows the person to drive or a termination of incapacity as provided by law. 9. A license to a person who is required by this chapter to take an examination unless the person successfully passes the examination. 10. A license to a person who is required under the motor vehicle financial responsibility laws of this state to deposit proof of financial responsibility and who has not deposited the proof. 11. A license to a person if the department has good cause to believe that the operation of a motor vehicle on the highways by the person would threaten the public safety or welfare. 12. A license to a person whose driver license has been ordered to be suspended for failure to pay child support, except that a noncommercial restricted license may be issued pursuant to section 25-518. 13. A class A, B or C license to a person whose license or driving privilege has been canceled until the cause for the cancellation has been removed. 14. A class A, B or C license or instruction permit to a person whose state of domicile is not this state. 15. A class A, B or C license to a person who fails to demonstrate proficiency in the English language as determined by the department. B. The department shall not issue a driver license to or renew the driver license of the following persons: 1. A person about whom the court notifies the department that the person violated the person's written promise to appear in court when charged with a violation of the motor vehicle laws of this state until the department receives notification in a manner approved by the department that the person appeared either voluntarily or involuntarily or that the case has been adjudicated, that the case is being appealed or that the case has otherwise been disposed of as provided by law. 2. If notified pursuant to section 28-1601, a person who fails to pay a civil penalty as provided in section 28-1601, except for a parking violation, until the department receives notification in a manner approved by the department that the person paid the civil penalty, that the case is being appealed or that the case has otherwise been disposed of as provided by law. C. The magistrate or the clerk of the court shall provide the notification to the department prescribed by subsection B of this section. D. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not issue to or renew a driver license or nonoperating identification license for a person who does not submit proof satisfactory to the department that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law.  For an application for a driver license or a nonoperating identification license, the department shall not accept as a primary source of identification a driver license issued by a state if the state does not require that a driver licensed in that state be lawfully present in the United States under federal law.  The director shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this subsection.  The rules shall include procedures for: 1. Verification that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law. 2. Issuance of a temporary driver permit pursuant to section 28-3157 pending verification of the applicant's status in the United States. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 28-3158, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3158. Driver license or instruction permit application A. A person who applies for an instruction permit or for a driver license shall use a form furnished by the department. B. An applicant shall pay the fee prescribed by section 28-3002 for a driver license or for an instruction permit issued under section 28-3154, 28-3155, 28-3156 or 28-3225. The department shall refund an application fee pursuant to section 28-373. C. An applicant for an instruction permit or a driver license shall give the department satisfactory proof of the applicant's full legal name, date of birth, sex and domicile residence address in this state, if the applicant has a residence address, and that the applicant's presence in the United States is authorized under federal law. and shall give the department the applicant's social security number, individual taxpayer identification number or consular IDENTIFICATION card number. D. The application for an instruction permit or a driver license shall state the following: 1. A brief description of the applicant and any other identifying information required by the department. 2. Whether the applicant has been licensed, and if so, the type of license issued, when the license was issued and what state or country issued the license. 3. If the applicant was never licensed, the applicant's last previous state or country of residence. 4. The social security number, individual taxpayer identification number or consular identification card number of the applicant. E. The department shall: 1. Verify that a social security number, individual taxpayer identification number or consular identification card number provided by an applicant is a valid number assigned to that applicant. 2. Retain the social security number, individual taxpayer identification number or consular identification card number in its records. F. The social security number, individual taxpayer identification number or consular identification card number provided to the department pursuant to subsection D of this section for an applicant's driver license or instruction permit shall not appear on an applicant's driver license or instruction permit unless the applicant requests that the social security number, individual taxpayer identification number or consular identification card number appear on the applicant's driver license or instruction permit as the driver license or instruction permit number.  Except as provided in sections 28-455 and 41-1954, the department shall not release the social security number, individual taxpayer identification number or consular identification card number to any person, including any agency of the federal government for the purposes of immigration, unless the applicant requests that the social security number, individual taxpayer identification number or consular identification card number appear on the applicant's driver license or instruction permit as the driver license or instruction permit number.  The provisions of this subsection shall be included in each application. G. The department may adopt and implement procedures to deny a driver license or instruction permit to a person who has been deported.  The department may adopt and implement procedures to reinstate a person's privilege to apply for a driver license or permit if the person's legal presence status is restored. H. G. On request of an applicant, the department shall allow the applicant to provide on the license or permit a post office box address that is regularly used by the applicant. I. h. The department may request an applicant who appears in person for a license, a duplicate license or reinstatement of a driving privilege to complete satisfactorily the vision screening prescribed by the department. J. i. If a driver license applicant submits satisfactory proof to the department that the applicant is a veteran, on request of the applicant, the department shall allow a distinguishing mark to appear on the license that identifies the person as a veteran. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 28-3166, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3166. Driver license content and application; marked licenses; emancipated minors A. The department shall issue a driver license to a qualified applicant. The driver license shall contain a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, the license class, any endorsements, the licensee's full name, date of birth and residence address, if the licensee has a residence address, a brief description of the licensee and either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space on which the licensee is required to write the licensee's usual signature with pen and ink. A driver license is not valid until it is signed by the licensee.  On request of an applicant: 1. The department shall allow the applicant to provide on the driver license a post office box address that is regularly used by the applicant and that is located in the county in which the applicant resides. 2. If the applicant submits satisfactory proof to the department that the applicant is a veteran, the department shall allow a distinguishing mark to appear on the license that identifies the person as a veteran. 3. If the applicant elects to show and submits satisfactory proof to the department that the applicant is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state, the department shall allow a distinguishing mark to appear on the license that identifies the applicant as a native American. The distinguishing mark may not identify a specific Indian tribe or other specific personal information that is submitted on documents that provide satisfactory proof that the person is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state. Documents that provide satisfactory proof that the person is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this state include: (a) An enhanced tribal card. (b) A tribal identification card. (c) A tribal certificate of Indian blood. (d) A tribal or bureau of Indian affairs affidavit of birth. B. An application for a driver license and the driver license issued shall contain the photo image of the applicant or licensee. When issuing a driver license, the department shall use a process that prohibits as nearly as possible the ability to alter or reproduce the license or that prohibits the ability to superimpose a photo image on the license without ready detection. The department shall process driver licenses and photo images in color. C. An applicant who is at least sixteen but under twenty-four years of age shall provide the department with satisfactory proof of the applicant's legal name and date of birth. D. If a person is qualified for a driver license and is under the legal drinking age, the department shall issue a license that is marked by color, code or design to immediately distinguish it from a license issued to a person of legal drinking age.  The department shall indicate on the driver license issued pursuant to this subsection the year in which the person will attain the legal drinking age. E. The department shall mark a special ignition interlock restricted driver license issued pursuant to chapter 4, article 3.1 of this title by color, code or design to immediately distinguish it from other licenses issued by the department. F. If a person is qualified for a driver license but is subject to the certified ignition interlock device limitations prescribed in section 28-1381, 28-1382, 28-1383 or 28-3319, the department shall issue a license that is marked by color, code or design to immediately distinguish it from other licenses issued by the department. G. The department shall not include information in the magnetic stripe and bar code of a driver license other than information that the department is authorized to obtain and place on a driver license pursuant to this article. H. If a minor has been emancipated pursuant to title 12, chapter 15, on application and proof of emancipation, the department shall issue a driver license that contains the words "emancipated minor". I. If a person is qualified for a driver license and does not provide a social security number to the department on the driver license or instruction permit application pursuant to section 28-3158, the department shall issue a driver license that contains the words "For driving privileges only. Not valid for identification".END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 28-3171, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3171. Driver license expiration and renewal; exception; extension A. Except as provided in subsection B, D, or E or f of this section and unless medical restrictions require a shorter expiration period, a driver license is: 1. Except as provided in paragraph 3 of this subsection, valid until the applicant's sixty-fifth birthday. 2. Renewable for successive periods of five years after the applicant's sixtieth birthday. 3. Valid for a period of up to five years if initially issued to an applicant who is sixty years of age or older. B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section and except as provided in subsection F of this section, on presentation of satisfactory proof of qualification, the director may issue a class D, G or M license or permit for a period of up to five years to: 1. A person who is an out-of-state student or who is the spouse of an out-of-state student. For the purposes of this paragraph, "out-of-state student" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-2001. 2. An immediate family member of any active duty military personnel temporarily stationed in this state. 3. Any other person for whom the director determines other circumstances justify the issuance. C. An applicant shall apply for renewal of a driver license before the expiration of a current license. The department may require an examination of a renewal applicant for a class D, G or M license as required of an original applicant. D. A veteran, as defined in section 41-601, whose driver license expires is not required to renew the veteran's driver license for six months after the date of the veteran's discharge from military service. E. The department may extend the expiration date of a class D or M license for a resident if the applicant is not in this state at the time the license expires and will not be in this state for at least thirty consecutive days after the expiration of the driver license. On payment by the applicant of the fee prescribed in section 28-3002, the department shall issue a certificate of extension that is valid only if accompanied by the applicant's previous license. An applicant for extension of a license shall comply with the following: 1. The application requirements of section 28-3158. 2. The licensing requirements of section 28-3153. 3. Medical requirements applicable to all license applicants, except that the applicant is not required to obtain an eyesight examination. F. A driver license is valid for a period of eight years if the driver license applicant does not provide the applicant's social security number on the driver license application. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Short title This act may be cited as the "Safe Mobility Act".